Utah statutes.
41-1a-703.   New owner to secure new registration and new certificate of title.

The transferee before operating or permitting the operation of a transferred vehicle on a highway shall present to the division the certificate of registration and the certificate of title, properly endorsed, and shall apply for a new certificate of title and obtain a new registration for the transferred vehicle, as upon an original registration, except as permitted under Sections 41-1a-223, 41-1a-520, and 41-1a-704.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

